Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-218
Scenic byways; prohibition of signs visible from main-traveled way; exceptions.

No sign shall be erected which is visible from the main-traveled way of any scenic byway except (1) directional and official signs to include, but not be limited to, signs and notices pertaining to natural wonders, scenic attractions, and historical attractions, (2) signs, displays, and devices advertising the sale or lease of property upon which such media are located, and (3) signs, displays, and devices advertising activities conducted on the property on which such media are located. Signs which are allowed shall comply with the standards and criteria established by rules and regulations of the Department of Transportation.

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 12;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 99.